California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(3) The Cypress neighborhood will face additional hardships related to the Cypress freeway reconstruction project for, unlike other freeway projects elsewhere, this will be the second time that residents and businesses in that neighborhood will be required to endure freeway construction-related problems, dislocations, and sacrifices.

(b) In order to alleviate a portion of those problems for residents and businesses in the Cypress neighborhood, the Legislature has enacted this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1228, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

227.1.

(a) In acquiring property for the Cypress freeway reconstruction project from the owner of a small business, the department shall make no deduction from the compensation to be paid for the property for hazardous substance removal and related remedial activities if the Department of Toxic Substances Control, the San Francisco Bay Regional Water Quality Control Board, and the Alameda County Department of Health all determine that the hazardous substance does not threaten to degrade the beneficial use of waters of the state, and does not otherwise pose a substantial hazard to human health or the environment.

(b) Nothing in this section relieves any prior owner from responsibility for any required cleanup or abatement action.

(c) For purposes of this section, “small business” means a for-profit enterprise having a net worth of not more than six million dollars ($6,000,000) and after tax profits of not more than four million dollars ($4,000,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1228, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Tourist Oriented Directional Signs [229.10. - 229.35.]



  ARTICLE 1. Scope [229.10. - 229.10.]

229.10.

This chapter governs the administration, standards, eligibility, and fees concerning the tourist oriented directional sign program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Program Administration and Standards [229.18. - 229.20.]

229.18.

The department shall administer the generic tourist oriented directional sign program and collect the fees described in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

229.19.

(a) The design and installation of signs pursuant to this chapter shall conform to any federal standards applicable to the highway. In addition, the signs shall meet the standards and criteria prescribed by this chapter, and shall be posted only in rural areas on noncongested conventional highways where a sign would not pose any traffic dangers or disrupt the free-flowing movement of vehicles.

(b) The department shall not approve the placement of a sign under any of the following circumstances:

(1) Within the boundaries of any city.

(2) If the sign promotes gambling activities.

(3) Within any urbanized area having a population of more than 50,000 persons, as designated by the most recent census of the United States Bureau of the Census.

(4) If approval of the sign would violate any federal law, rule, or regulation and that violation would result in the loss of federal funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 374, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

229.20.

No signs authorized by this chapter shall be posted on any scenic highway, unless the county board of supervisors of the county in which the sign will be placed grants approval. Approval shall be given upon a modification of, and shall be consistent with, any existing corridor protection ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Eligibility [229.25. - 229.31.]

229.25.

The department shall determine that the facilities and attractions for which generic tourist oriented directional signs are provided meet the minimum criteria set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

229.26.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the distance from the nearest highway intersection to the nearest facility or attraction shall not exceed 10 miles.

(b) The maximum distance from the signed intersection to the nearest facility or attraction shall not exceed the following:

(1) One mile for a service station.

(2) Three miles for food or lodging facilities.

(c) The requirement specified in subdivision (a) does not apply
 to tourist oriented directional signs to facilities or attractions located in the County of Tehama that are directly related to an American Viticultural Area established pursuant to Part 9 (commencing with Section 9.1) of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations located in that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 156, Sec. 2.   (SB 1259)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

229.27.

Facilities for which signing is provided shall be located on a reasonably direct and maintained route and have sufficient signing to guide the motorist to the facility and back to the highway, as determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

229.275.

All sign contracts are for a two-year period and are subject to reevaluation by the department at the end of that period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

229.28.

The number of generic tourist oriented directional signs shall not exceed three signs on an approach to an intersection from either direction. If more signs are requested than authorized by this section, the department shall select the three facilities or attractions receiving the highest rankings based on existing criteria and point ranking systems developed for other business signing programs. Based on the rankings, an existing sign posted pursuant to this chapter may be displaced by a new sign at the end of a two-year contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

229.281.

(a) The department shall also take into consideration whether a business, attraction, or facility has existing on-premise or off-premise advertising structures located on a nearby state highway when determining its eligibility for a generic tourist oriented directional sign.

(b) The decision to place generic tourist oriented directional signs is at the sole discretion of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 374, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

229.282.

(a) In any county having an active farm trails program that is recognized by the board of supervisors of that county, the individualized farm trail symbol may serve as the symbol on generic tourist oriented directional signs, if the farm trail signs comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(b) As used in this section, an active farm trails program means an organization of farmers and other rural enterprises that are in direct contact with the traveling public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 374, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

229.285.

Tourist oriented directional signs erected pursuant to this chapter shall not identify particular businesses or services by name, but rather shall be generic and identify only the type or nature of the business or service available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

229.286.

Signs identifying the location or proximity of gambling activities are not eligible for placement under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

229.29.

In order to be eligible for a generic tourist oriented directional sign, an individual business or, if more than one business is to be included, then a majority of the businesses and attractions within 10 driving miles of the sign, shall conform to all of the following:

(a) Open to the public at least 40 hours per week and six days per week, for a minimum of three continuous months per year, and maintain regular hours and schedules.

(b) Seasonal businesses and attractions closed more than one week at a time shall have the sign covered or removed by the department during the period of closure.

(c) Possess any appropriate business license approved by the state and local agency regulating the particular business.

(d) Each business or attraction identified on a tourist oriented directional sign shall provide assurance of its conformity with all applicable laws concerning the public accommodation without regard to race, color, sex, culture, social origin or condition, or political or religious ideas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 374, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

229.30.

If a business or attraction violates any provision of this chapter or regulations adopted by the department, it may lose its eligibility for a tourist oriented directional sign. The department may request the immediate removal of a generic tourist oriented directional sign if a business or attraction violates any section of this law or regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

229.31.

No business or attraction shall be eligible for a generic tourist oriented directional sign if it is adjacent to, and visible from, the highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Fees [229.35. - 229.35.]

229.35.

The department shall establish and charge a fee to place and maintain generic tourist oriented directional signs in an amount at least 25 percent above its estimated cost in designing, placing, and maintaining the signs. Funds derived from the imposition of the fee shall, upon appropriation, be used to fund all operations and related administrative functions of the department pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. The State Highway System [230. - 635.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [230. - 237.]

230.

The highways described in this chapter are State highways.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

231.

As used in this chapter, “route” means State highway route and the route numbers are those given the State highway routes or portions thereof by the commission. Each complete route is described in article 3 of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

233.

All title acquired by the public or by any governmental agency to any real property, or interests therein, used for rights of way of any highway heretofore or hereafter constituted a State highway is vested in the name of the people of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 264.)
-------------------------------------------

235.

(a) The department shall prepare and make available on its internet website historical data and information about projects on the state highway system covering the projects on a fiscal year basis on the state highway system from July 1, 2018, to June 30, 2023, inclusive. The department shall make this data and information available no later than January 1, 2025. The department, in consultation with the commission, shall develop a format for the data and information. The historical data and information shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The number of total lane miles in the state highway system.

(2) The number of new total lane miles added to the state highway system.

(3) Of the lane miles added to the state highway system, a breakdown of the number of miles added by type, including, but not limited to, general purpose lanes, auxiliary lanes, managed lanes,
 including high-occupancy vehicle lanes, and interchanges, as well as information on improvements to interchanges.

(4) A project description of each project that added lane miles to the state highway system.

(5) The number of miles of the state highway system that were relinquished.

(6) The number of miles of the state highway system that were converted from a general purpose lane to a managed lane, including a high-occupancy vehicle lane, and a high-occupancy vehicle lane to a high-occupancy toll lane or other type of lane.

(7) The number of homes and businesses that were relocated due to the acquisition of rights-of-way for the new lane miles on the
 state highway system.

(8) The number of new bike lane miles added to state highways, broken down by Class I, Class II, Class III, and Class IV.

(9) The number of new sidewalk miles added to state highways and the number of existing sidewalks that were reconstructed to improve accessibility and the safety of pedestrians.

(b) The department shall prepare and make available on its internet website data and information on planned, pending projects on the state highway system no later than January 1, 2025. The department, in consultation with the commission, shall develop a format for the data and information. The data and information shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A description of each project, including the location. Location information shall allow the public to clearly understand where the project is being undertaken and may include, to the extent available, specific highway routes, project boundaries, and geolocation data.

(2) The date each project initiation document was completed.

(3) The status of each project including the current phase of development, designated as environmental, design, right-of-way, or construction.

(4) A determination of the primary purpose and need of each project, if available.

(c) The department shall present the data and
 information required pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) to the commission at a regularly scheduled commission meeting on or before April 1, 2025.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 629, Sec. 1.   (SB 695)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

236.

(a) (1) The department shall prepare and make available on an annual basis on its internet website data and information about projects on the state highway system covering the prior fiscal year. The department shall make this data and information available no later than January 1, 2026, and January 1 of each year thereafter. The department, in consultation with the commission, shall develop a format for the data and information.

(2) For the data and information required to be made available no later than January 1, 2026, pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall also include data and information about projects on the state highway system covering the 2023–24 fiscal year.

(b) The data and information shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) All of the data and information described in paragraphs (1) to (9), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 235.

(2) A quantification of an increase or decrease in greenhouse gas emissions associated with the lane miles added to the state highway system, if available.

(3) A quantification of an increase or decrease in vehicle miles traveled on the state highway system associated with the lane miles added to the state highway system.

(4) A quantification of the mitigation required by Section 21099 of the Public Resources Code as part of the projects that resulted in additional lane miles on the state highway system.

(5) The number of connections made with locally owned bike and walk facilities.

(c) The department shall present the data and information required by this section to the commission at a regularly scheduled commission meeting on or before April 1 of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 629, Sec. 2.   (SB 695)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

237.

(a) The department shall prepare a report evaluating current efforts and potential opportunities to streamline the processes and procedures for the delivery of safety enhancement projects on the state highway system, including all of the following:

(1) A review of administrative, regulatory, and procedural factors that affect the timing of safety enhancement projects.

(2) An evaluation of the use and feasibility of alternative project delivery methods, such as design-build, progressive design-build, job order contracting, and construction manager/general contractor, and other innovative approaches, as determined by the department.

(3) An assessment of whether the department has sufficient statutory authority to effectively use
 the methods evaluated pursuant to paragraph (2) for safety-specific projects, and the identification of any areas where additional authority may be needed.

(4) Recommendations for enhancing interagency coordination and procurement strategies to streamline delivery of safety enhancement projects without compromising safety or transparency.

(5) A summary of existing and planned department initiatives to streamline the delivery of safety enhancements.

(b) The report required by this section shall be used as an informational source and shall be based only on available data.

(c) The report required by this section shall not do either of the
 following:

(1) Include project-specific findings or imply causality between delivery timelines and safety outcomes.

(2) Create a new duty, right, or standard of care for the department.

(d) (1) On or before January 1, 2027, the department shall submit the report required by this section to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) Pursuant to Section
 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 743, Sec. 1.   (SB 78)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The California Freeway and Expressway System [250. - 257.]

250.

It is hereby declared to be essential to the future development of the State of California to establish and construct a statewide system of freeways and expressways and connections thereto without regard to present jurisdiction over the highways, roads, and streets that might be included. It is the intent, further, that the California Freeway and Expressway System be completed with provision for control of access to the extent necessary to preserve the value and utility of the facilities to be constructed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1062.)
-------------------------------------------

251.

It is further declared to be essential to the future development of the State of California that the deficiencies on the State Highway System not a part of the California Freeway and Expressway System and deficiencies on connections to the State Highway System be corrected simultaneously with the highways in the California Freeway and Expressway System in proportion to the relative deficiencies and the needs of traffic service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1062.)
-------------------------------------------

252.

The Legislature recognizes that the dynamic growth of this State will require periodic review of the California Freeway and Expressway System. The Legislature recognizes further that all highway planning and construction work should be correlated with a plan to provide a comprehensive system of access-controlled freeways and expressways throughout the State, and that the California Freeway and Expressway System established by this article has been selected and developed as a result of scientific studies by all levels of government in the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1062.)
-------------------------------------------

253.

The California Freeway and Expressway System is hereby established and shall be composed of the highways specified in this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

253.1.

The California freeway and expressway system shall include:

Routes 5, 6, 7, 8, 10, 11, 14, 15, 18, 24, 28, 32, 34, 37, 40, 44, 47, 48, 50, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 59, 60, 61, 63, 65, 67, 68, 70, 71, 73, 74, 78, 80, 81, 83, 85, 87, 88, 89, 90, 93, 97, 100, 102, 103, 105, 107, 108, 118, 121, 122, 124, 125, 126, 134, 136, 139, 140, 145, 148, 149, 154, 156, 161, 163, 164, 179, 181, 183, 184, 199, 205, 210, 215, 217, 221, 223, 230, 232, 234, 235, 237, 238, 239, 241, 242, 247, 249, 251, 257, 258, 259, 261, 280, 330, 371, 380, 405, 505, 580, 605, 680, 780, 805, 880, and 980 in their entirety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 835, Sec. 4.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

253.2.

The California freeway and expressway system shall also include:

Route 1 from:

(a) Los Angeles-Ventura county line to Route 101 near El Rio.

(b) Route 101 near Las Cruces to Route 227 south of Oceano.

(c) Route 101 near San Luis Obispo to San Simeon.

(d) The north limits of Carmel to the west city limits of Santa Cruz.

(e) The Higgins-Purisima Road to Route 280 south of San Francisco.

(f) Route 280 to the San Francisco county line.

(g) Route 101 near the southerly end of Marin Peninsula to the vicinity of Valley Ford.

(h) Route 128 near the mouth of the Navarro River to Route 101 near Leggett.

Route 2 from Glendale Boulevard in Los Angeles County to Route 210.

Route 3 from Route 299 near Weaverville to Route 5 near Yreka.

Route 4 from:

(a) Route 80 in Hercules to Route 99 near Stockton.

(b) Route 99 near Stockton to Route 65.

Route 12 from:

(a) Route 1 near Valley Ford to Route 101 at Santa Rosa.

(b) Route 101 near Santa Rosa to Melita Road near Santa Rosa.

(c) Route 29 in the vicinity of Napa to Route 80 near Cordelia.

(d) Route 80 near Fairfield to Route 99 near Lodi via Rio Vista.

(e) Route 99 near Lodi to Route 88 near Lockeford.

(f) Route 88 near Clements to Route 49 near San Andreas.

Route 13 from:

(a) Route 61 near the Oakland International Airport to Route 24.

(b) Route 80 to Route 61 near Emeryville.

Route 16 from:

(a) Route 505 to Route 5 near Woodland.

(b) Route 50 near Perkins to Route 49 near Drytown.

Route 17 from:

(a) Route 1 near Santa Cruz to Granite Creek Road near Scott’s Valley.

(b) The south city limits of Los Gatos to Route 280 in San Jose.

Route 20 from Route 101 to Route 80 near Emigrant Gap.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 136, Sec. 1.   Effective July 31, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

253.3.

The California freeway and expressway system shall also include:

Route 22 from:

(a) Studebaker Road in Long Beach to Route 405.

(b) Route 405 to Route 55 near Orange.

Route 23 from:

(a) Route 101 in Thousand Oaks to Route 118.

(b) Route 118 to Route 126 near Fillmore.

Route 25 from:

(a) Route 180 near Paicines to Route 156 in Hollister.

(b) Route 156 in Hollister to Route 101 near Gilroy.

Route 26 from Route 99 near Stockton to Route 12.

Route 29 from:

(a) Route 80 near Vallejo to Oak Knoll Avenue north of the City of Napa.

(b) The Napa-Lake county line to Route 20.

Route 33 from:

(a) Route 101 near Ventura to Route 150.

(b) Route 150 to Route 166 near Maricopa.

(c) Route 152 west of Los Banos to Route 5 near Santa Nella.

Route 35 from Route 280 to Route 1 near Daly City.

Route 36 from Route 5 at Red Bluff to Route 395.

Route 38 from Route 10 near Redlands to Route 18 near Baldwin Lake.

Route 39 from Route 5 to Route 210.

Route 41 from:

(a) Route 1 near Morro Bay to Route 101 near Atascadero.

(b) Route 46 to Route 99 near Fresno.

(c) Route 99 near Fresno to Route 180.

(d) Route 180 to Yosemite National Park.

Route 43 from Route 5 to Route 99 near Selma.

Route 45 from Route 20 near Colusa to Route 32 near Hamilton City.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

253.4.

The California freeway and expressway system shall also include:

Route 46 from Route 101 in San Luis Obispo County to Route 99 near Famoso.

Route 49 from:

(a) Route 41 near Oakhurst to Route 140 at Mariposa.

(b) Route 108 south of Jamestown to Route 108 near Sonora.

(c) Route 88 near Jackson to Route 50 near Placerville.

(d) Route 80 near Auburn to Route 20 in Grass Valley.

(e) Route 20 at Nevada City to Route 89 near Sattley.

(f) Route 89 near Sierraville to Route 70 near Vinton.

Route 58 from:

(a) Route 5 to Route 43.

(b) Route 43 to Route 99.

(c) Route 99 near Bakersfield to Route 15 near Barstow.

Route 62 from Route 10 near Whitewater to Route 247 near Yucca Valley.

Route 76 from Route 5 near Oceanside to Route 15.

Route 77 from Route 93 westerly of Moraga to Route 24 near Lafayette.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 409, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

253.5.

The California freeway and expressway system also includes:

Route 79 from:

(a) Route 8 near Descanso to Route 78.

(b) Route 371 near Aguanga to Route 15 near Temecula.

(c) Route 15 near Temecula to Route 74 near Hemet.

(d) Route 74 near Hemet to Route 10 near Beaumont.

Route 84 from:

(a) The westerly approach to the Dumbarton Bridge to Route 880.

(b) Route 880 to Route 238.

(c) Route 680 near Scotts Corners to Route 580 in Livermore.

(d) Route 580 in Livermore to Route 4 near Brentwood.

(e) Route 12 at Rio Vista to Route 50 near Broderick.

Route 86 from Route 78 near Brawley to Route 10 in Indio.

Route 91 from Route 405 to Route 215 near Riverside.

Route 92 from:

(a) Route 1 near Half Moon Bay to Route 280.

(b) Route 280 to Route 238.

Route 94 from Route 5 near San Diego to 0.3 miles east of Sweetwater Bridge.

Route 95 from Route 10 near Blythe to Route 40 near Needles.

Route 99 from:

(a) Route 5 south of Bakersfield to Route 50 in Sacramento.

(b) Route 5 in Sacramento to Route 36 near Red Bluff.

Route 101 from:

(a) Route 5 near Seventh Street in Los Angeles to near Fell Street in San Francisco.

(b) A point in Marin County opposite San Francisco to the Oregon state line north of Crescent City.

Route 110 from Route 47 to Colorado Boulevard in Pasadena.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 28.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

253.6.

The California freeway and expressway system shall also include:

Route 111 from:

(a) The international boundary south of Calexico to Route 78 near Brawley passing east of Heber.

(b) Route 78 near Brawley to Route 86 near Mecca via the north shore of the Salton Sea.

(c) San Rafael Drive in Palm Springs to Route 10 near Whitewater.

Route 113 from Route 80 near Davis to Route 99 near Tudor.

Route 116 from:

(a) Route 181 near Forestville to Route 101 near Cotati.

(b) Route 101 near Petaluma to Route 121 near Schellville.

Route 120 from:

(a) Route 5 near Mossdale to the west boundary of Yosemite National Park.

(b) The east boundary of Yosemite National Park to Route 395 near Mono Lake. 

Route 127 from Route 15 near Baker to Route 190 near Death Valley Junction.

Route 128 from:

(a) The mouth of the Navarro River to Route 101 near Cloverdale.

(b) Route 101 to Route 29 at Calistoga.

(c) Route 121 to Route 113 near Davis.

Route 132 from:

(a) Route 580 west of Vernalis to Route 99 at Modesto.

(b) Route 99 to Route 65.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1187, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

253.7.

The California freeway and expressway system shall also include:

Route 133 from Route 73 to Route 241.

Route 137 from Route 99 near Tulare to Route 65 near Lindsay.

Route 138 from Route 5 near Gorman to Route 15 near Cajon Pass.

Route 142 from Route 71 near Chino to Route 210 near Upland.

Route 152 from Route 101 to Route 65 near Sharon via Pacheco Pass.

Route 160 from:

(a) Route 4 near Antioch to Route 12 near Rio Vista.

(b) Sacramento to Route 51.

Route 166 from:

(a) Route 101 near Santa Maria to Route 33 in Cuyama Valley.

(b) Route 33 near Maricopa to Route 5.

Route 168 from Fresno to Huntington Lake.

Route 170 from Route 101 near Riverside Drive to Route 5 near Tujunga Wash.

Route 178 from:

(a) Bakersfield to Route 14 near Freeman.

(b) Route 14 near Freeman to the vicinity of the San Bernardino county line.

Route 180 from:

(a) Route 25 near Paicines to Route 5.

(b) Route 5 to Route 99 passing near Mendota.

(c) Route 99 near Fresno to General Grant Grove section of Kings Canyon National Park.

Route 190 from Route 136 near Keeler to Route 127 near Death Valley Junction.

Route 193 from Route 65 near Lincoln to Route 80 near Newcastle.

Route 198 from Route 5 near Oilfields to the Sequoia National Park line.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 12.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

253.8.

The California freeway and expressway system shall also include:

Route 227 from Route 1 south of Oceano to Route 101 near Arroyo Grande.

Route 244 from Route 80 to Auburn Boulevard.

Route 299 fromRoute 101 near Arcata to Route 395 at Alturas.

Route 395 from:

(a) Route 15 near Cajon Pass to the Nevada state line.

(b) Nevada state line northwest of Reno to Route 36 near Johnstonville.

(c) Route 36 near Termo to the Oregon state line.

Route 905 from Route 5 near the south end of San Diego Bay to the international boundary southerly of Brown Field.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 828, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

253.9.

(a) The California freeway and expressway system shall also include Route 710 from:

(1) Route 47 to Route 1.

(2) Route 1 near the City of Long Beach to Alhambra Avenue in the City of Los Angeles.

(3) California Boulevard in the City of Pasadena to Route 210.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 791, Sec. 4.   (AB 29)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.   See identical section added by Sec. 6, Stats. 2019, Ch. 835.)
-------------------------------------------

253.9.

(a) The California freeway and expressway system shall also include Route 710 from:

(1) Route 47 to Route 1.

(2) Route 1 near the City of Long Beach to Alhambra Avenue in the City of Los Angeles.

(3) California Boulevard in the City of Pasadena to Route 210.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 835, Sec. 6.   (SB 7)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.   See identical section added by Sec. 4, Stats. 2019, Ch. 791.)
-------------------------------------------

254.

As specific locations are determined by the commission for portions of state highways included in the California freeway and expressway system, the commission shall designate the particular portion as a part of the California freeway and expressway system and the planning and design of such highways shall include provision for such access control as the department and the commission determine essential to protect the investment of any improvements made and to permit the ultimate development of a full freeway or an expressway when traffic and other conditions require. Such declaration by the commission shall have the effect of declaring the particular portion affected a freeway within the meaning of Section 100.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 58.)
-------------------------------------------

255.

Nothing contained in this article shall prevent the department, either by acquisition or by condemnation, from terminating easements of access to any state highway not in the California Freeway and Expressway System, provided that such action by the department shall not have the effect of including the highway in the California Freeway and Expressway System.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1062.)
-------------------------------------------

256.1.

Prior to recommending to the Legislature the deletion of a highway, or a portion thereof, from the state highway system, the commission or the department shall hold a public hearing on, and shall give written notices to the legislative bodies of the cities and counties located in the affected area of, the proposed recommendation, and shall publish notice of the public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the areas affected by the proposed deletion. The commission or the department may, at its own option, because of controversy or lack of local consensus, hold the hearing at a location which is reasonably convenient to the communities affected by the proposed deletion, to the general public, and to the commission or the department in the discharge of its regular business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 828, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

257.

For the purpose of this article only, and to distinguish between the terms “freeway” and “expressway,” the word “freeway” shall mean a divided arterial highway for through traffic with full control of access and with grade separations at intersections, while the word “expressway” shall mean an arterial highway for through traffic which may have partial control of access, but which may or may not be divided or have grade separations at intersections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1062.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. State Scenic Highways [260. - 284.]

260.

It is the intent of the Legislature in designating certain portions of the state highway system as state scenic highways to establish the State’s responsibility for the protection and enhancement of California’s natural scenic beauty by identifying those portions of the state highway system which, together with the adjacent scenic corridors, require special scenic conservation treatment. It is further declared to be the intent of the Legislature in designating such scenic highways to assign responsibility for the development of such scenic highways and for the establishment and application of specific planning and design standards and procedures appropriate thereto and to indicate, in broad statement terms, the location and extent of routes and areas requiring continuing and careful co-ordination of planning, design, construction, and regulation of land use and development, by state and local agencies as appropriate, to protect the social and economic values provided by the State’s scenic resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1788.)
-------------------------------------------

261.

The department shall establish and apply pertinent planning and design standards for development of official scenic highways.

In establishing and applying such standards for, and undertaking the development of, official scenic highways, the department shall take into consideration the concept of the “complete highway,” which is a highway which incorporates not only safety, utility, and economy but also beauty. The department shall also take into consideration in establishing such standards that, in a “complete highway,” pleasing appearance is a consideration in the planning and design process. In the development of official scenic highways, the department shall give special attention both to the impact of the highway on the landscape and to the highway’s visual appearance. The standards for official scenic highways shall also require that local governmental agencies have taken such action as may be necessary to protect the scenic appearance of the scenic corridor, the band of land generally adjacent to the highway right-of-way, including, but not limited to, (1) regulation of land use and intensity (density) of development; (2) detailed land and site planning; (3) control of outdoor advertising; (4) careful attention to and control of earthmoving and landscaping; and (5) the design and appearance of structures and equipment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 77, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

262.

Whenever the department determines that the corridor protection program for any state highway in the state scenic highway system established by this article has been implemented by local governmental agencies and a plan and program has been developed by the department for bringing the highway up to the standards for official scenic highways established by the department, including the concept of the “complete highway,” as described in Section 261, the department shall designate the highway as an official state scenic highway and shall so indicate the highway in any publications of the department or in any maps which are issued by the department to the public.

The department shall cause appropriate signs to be placed and maintained along the portions of the state scenic highway system which the department has designated as official state scenic highways that indicate that the highways are official state scenic highways.

If at any time the department determines that the corridor protection program of local governmental agencies, with respect to any highway which has been designated as an official state scenic highway, no longer adequately carries out responsibility of the local governmental agencies for the protection of the scenic corridor, it may revoke the designation of the highway as an official state scenic highway and remove the signs which so indicate the highway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 77, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

262.1.

A local agency, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 65402 of the Government Code, shall coordinate its planning with, and obtain the approval from, the appropriate local planning agency on the location and construction of any new district facility that would be within the scenic corridor of any state scenic highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1531.)
-------------------------------------------

262.5.

(a) Whenever the department determines that any state highway within or traversing United States National Forest lands meets the standards for official state scenic highways, the department shall designate the highway as an official state scenic highway and shall so indicate the highway in any publications of the department or in any maps which are issued by the department to the public.

(b) The department shall cause appropriate signs to be placed and maintained along those portions of the highways which the department has designated pursuant to subdivision (a) as official state scenic highways that indicate that those portions of the highways are official state scenic highways.

(c) If at any time the department determines that a state highway, designated as an official state scenic highway pursuant to subdivision (a), no longer meets the standards for official state scenic highways, it may revoke the designation of the highway as an official state highway and remove the signs which so indicate the highway.
